Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-2301 to 2-2321 shall be known and may
be cited as the Nebraska Wheat Resources Act.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 1, p. 59;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 1.